Wyoming, session 2026, HB0081.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-2-204(a) and (f),
31-2-205(a)(i)(intro), 31-2-212, 31-2-213(b) and (h)(viii),
31-2-215(a) and (c), 31-2-216(a), 31-2-217(a) and (m),
31-2-223(c), 31-2-233(d), 31-2-234(f) and 31-2-235(e) are
amended to read:

31-2-204. Issuance of certificates of registration
and license plates by county; form.
HB0081

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0315

(a) Upon receipt of an approved application and
payment of fees the county treasurer shall issue to the
applicant a certificate of registration conforming with the
facts set forth in the application together with one (1)
license plate or validation sticker for motorcycles,
multipurpose vehicles, trailers, including house trailers,
and vehicles operated with dealer license plates and two
(2) license plates or proper validation stickers for any
other vehicle all vehicles. A physical or electronic copy
of the certificate of registration shall be carried at all
times in the motor vehicle for which it is valid and shall
be displayed upon demand of any peace officer. A
certificate of registration issued by a county treasurer
may be provided in electronic form.

(f) Any person may apply for one (1) set of decals
decal for breast cancer awareness for any license plate
issued under this article. A decal supporting breast cancer
awareness shall bear the breast cancer ribbon symbol and
shall be attached in the lower left corner of the license
plate without obscuring any other symbols, letters or
numbers on the license plate. Application forms shall be
HB0081

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0315
available at all county treasurer's offices. Each applicant
for a decal under this subsection shall submit an
administration fee with the application. The fee shall be
in an amount determined by the department to be sufficient
to recover reasonable administrative costs of the decal,
but not more than five dollars ($5.00) per set of decals
decal for any one (1) vehicle. Upon completion of the
application, receipt of the administration fee and issuance
or renewal of a license plate under this article, the
county treasurer shall issue to the applicant the number of
decals corresponding to the number of license plates issued
or renewed. Decals issued under this subsection shall not
be required to be renewed upon renewal of a license plate.
The replacement fee for a decal under this subsection shall
be the same as for the original decal.

31-2-205. Display of license plates.

(a) License plates for vehicles shall be:

(i) Conspicuously displayed and securely
fastened to be plainly visible: on the rear of the vehicle;

HB0081

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0315
31-2-212. Loss, mutilation or destruction of
registration, plates or validation stickers.

Upon loss, mutilation or destruction of a certificate of
registration, license plate, or validation sticker the
owner of a vehicle may obtain a duplicate certificate of
registration, new license plates plate or validation
stickers sticker from any county treasurer or the
department if the vehicle was registered or plates or
stickers were the plate or sticker was issued by the
department upon application showing the loss, mutilation or
destruction, return of the mutilated plates or stickers
plate or sticker and payment of the duplicate registration,
plate or sticker fee. For those vehicles registered under
the provisions of W.S. 31-2-213(h), 31-2-215 through
31-2-223, 31-2-226, 31-2-227 or 31-2-229 through 31-2-235
replacement duplicate license plates may be obtained upon
application with the county treasurer from which the
original plates were purchased or the department if
applicable, accompanied by fees as provided by W.S.
31-3-102(a)(vi)(C). Duplicate license plates obtained under
this section to replace lost or stolen plates shall not be
displayed on the vehicle until the validation stickers on
HB0081

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0315
the lost or stolen plates have expired. Upon loss,
mutilation or destruction of a dealer plate or validation
sticker the dealer may obtain a replacement dealer plate or
validation sticker from the county treasurer from which he
purchased the original plate in the same manner as the
owner of a vehicle and upon payment of the appropriate fee
under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(vi). Obtaining a replacement plate
is not the purchase of an additional plate under W.S.
31-16-125(b)(i). Upon application for new license plates or
stickers the county treasurer shall notify the department
and the county sheriff as soon as possible of the loss,
mutilation or destruction. The department shall notify the
appropriate law enforcement agencies of any loss,
mutilation or destruction of license plates or stickers.

31-2-213. Department to supply registration
certificates, plates and stickers; removable windshield
placards.

(b) The department may issue license plates, except
permanent, dealer and antique motor vehicle license plates,
which shall be valid for not more than eight (8) years if
an annual validation stickers are sticker is attached in
HB0081

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0315
the upper left corner of the license plate with the month
and year of expiration clearly visible. Department
authorized license plates and annual stickers shall be of
colors that are readily distinguishable from the previous
year.

(h) Effective January 1, 1993, any person eligible
for a special placard under subsection (c) of this section
may apply to the county treasurer for special license
plates for a motor vehicle owned by that person. Special
license plates shall not be issued to any person who is
eligible only for a temporary removable windshield placard
under subsection (g) of this section. Special plates issued
under this subsection are subject to the following:

(viii) The county treasurer shall issue a set of
plates license plate for each vehicle and a special license
plate for each motorcycle or multipurpose vehicle
registered to a qualified applicant under this subsection
upon payment of required fees.

31-2-215. Disabled veteran's license plates.

HB0081

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0315
(a) A disabled veteran who receives fifty percent
(50%) or more service connected disability compensation
from the United States department of veteran's affairs and
who is a resident at the time of initial application and
renewal application under subsection (b) of this section,
may apply for distinctive license plates for a passenger
car, pickup truck, motorcycle or multipurpose vehicle owned
or leased by him upon registration of the vehicle. These
license plates shall be displayed upon the vehicle for
which they are issued. A disabled veteran may purchase one
(1) additional pair of license plates plate as provided in
this section for either a motorcycle or a multipurpose
vehicle upon payment of regular fees provided in this
article. The license plates shall bear a distinctive symbol
or letters identifying the registrant as a disabled
veteran. The department shall prescribe the symbol or
letters which shall not include arabic numerals designating
the county.

(c) The county treasurer shall only issue one (1)
pair of license plates plate annually that are is exempt as
provided by W.S. 31-3-101(b)(xv) to each applicant under
this section.
HB0081

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0315

31-2-216. Special plates; former prisoners of war.

(a) The county treasurer shall issue one (1) set of
special license plates plate for either a passenger car,
truck or motor home owned or leased by a former prisoner of
war in accordance with this section for the year 1988 and
thereafter.

31-2-217. Special plates; Pearl Harbor survivors;
national guard members; armed forces veterans; purple heart
recipients; women armed forces veteran decals.

(a) The county treasurer shall issue one (1) set of
special license plates plate to each applicant for either a
passenger car, truck, motorcycle, handicapped motorcycle or
motor home owned or leased by a survivor of Pearl Harbor, a
member of the Wyoming army or air national guard, a purple
heart recipient or honorably discharged veteran of the
United States armed forces and, if applied for and
eligible, one (1) set of decals decal designating the
person is an honorably discharged woman veteran of the
United States armed forces in accordance with this section.
HB0081

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0315
These license plates shall be displayed upon the vehicle
for which they are issued. A decal designating the person
is an honorably discharged woman veteran shall be attached
in the lower left corner of a license plate issued under
this section.

(m) The decal designating a woman veteran of the
United States armed forces shall bear a distinctive symbol
or letters identifying the registrant as an honorably
discharged woman veteran of the United States armed forces.
Each applicant for a decal under this subsection shall
submit an administration fee with the application. The fee
shall be in an amount determined by the department to be
sufficient to recover reasonable administrative costs of
the decal, but not more than five dollars ($5.00) per set
of decals decal for any one (1) vehicle. Upon completion of
the application, receipt of the administration fee,
determination of eligibility and issuance or renewal of
special license plates under this section, the county
treasurer shall issue to the applicant the number of decals
corresponding to the number of license plates issued or
renewed under this section to be attached to the license
plates issued or renewed under this section. The
HB0081

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0315
replacement fee for a decal under this subsection shall be
the same as for the original decal.

31-2-223. Antique motor vehicles.

(c) Upon receipt of an approved application and
payment of fees the vehicle shall be registered and a
license plates issued therefor plate shall be issued for
the vehicle. The registration expires upon transfer of
ownership of the vehicle. Notwithstanding W.S.
31-2-205(a)(i)(A), a license plate shall only be required
to be displayed on the rear of those antique motor vehicles
that were originally manufactured to have one (1) license
plate.

31-2-233. Organ, eye and tissue donation license
plates.

(d) Unless five hundred (500) sets of license plates
are issued to not less than five hundred (500) vehicles
under this section before December 31, 2031, the plates
authorized under this section shall be eliminated from
production and not later than January 15, 2033 the
HB0081

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0315
department shall report the cessation of production to the
joint transportation, highways and military affairs interim
committee.

31-2-234. Search and rescue license plates.

(f) Unless one thousand (1,000) sets of license
plates are issued to not less than one thousand (1,000)
vehicles under this section before December 31, 2032, the
plates authorized under this section shall be eliminated
from production and the department shall report the
cessation of production to the legislature not later than
January 15, 2033.

31-2-235. Rodeo license plates.

(e) Unless five hundred (500) sets of license plates
are issued to not less than five hundred (500) vehicles
under this section before December 31, 2031, the plates
authorized under this section shall be eliminated from
production and not later than January 15, 2032 the
department shall report the cessation of production to the
HB0081

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0315
joint transportation, highways and military affairs interim
committee.

Section 2. W.S. 31-2-205(a)(i)(A) and (B) is
repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0081